Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Legislative Assembly  finds that a quarterly economic and revenue
forecast projects that revenues in the state’s General Fund in the current  biennium will be
at least two percent below what the revenues  were projected to be in the revenue forecast
on which the legislatively adopted budget for the current biennium was based.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other transfer from  the Education
Stability Fund, based on the findings in  section 1 of this 2020 second special session Act, and
pursuant to Article XV, section 4 (6), of  the Oregon Constitution, the State Treasurer, on
March 1, 2021, shall transfer $400,000,000 from the Education Stability Fund established under
ORS 348.696 and Article XV, section 4 (4)(d), of the  Oregon Constitution, to the State School
Fund established under ORS 327.008.
SECTION 3.
This 2020 second special session Act being necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to  exist, and
this 2020 second special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4303 (HB 4303-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4303 (HB 4303-INTRO) Page 2